North Dakota statutes. TITLE 64 Weights, Measures, and Grades
CHAPTER 64-01 General Units of Weights and Measures

64-01-01.
Dry measure.

The standard measure of capacity for commodities sold by dry measure shall be the bushel containing two thousand one hundred fifty and forty-two hundredths cubic inches [35239.07 milliliters]. The half bushel, peck, half peck, quarter peck, quart, and pint shall be derived by successively dividing that measure by two.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3000a1; R.C. 1943, § 64-0101.

Cross-References.

Civil penalty for violation of statute, commission order or commission regulation, see N.D.C.C. § 49-07-01.1.

Collateral References.

Shipper’s misdescription of goods as affecting carrier’s liability for loss or damage, 1 A.L.R.3d 736.

64-01-02.
Liquid measure.

The standard measure of a capacity for liquids shall be the wine gallon containing two hundred thirty-one cubic inches [3785.41 milliliters]. A barrel shall contain thirty-one and fifty hundredths gallons [119.24 liters] and a hogshead shall contain sixty-three gallons [238.48 liters].

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 3000a2; R.C. 1943, § 64-0102.

64-01-03.
Lineal measure.

The standard measure of length, from which all other measures of extension, lineal, superficial, or solid shall be derived, is the yard of three feet or thirty-six inches [914.40 millimeters].

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 3000a3; R.C. 1943, § 64-0103.

64-01-04.
Hundredweight.

In contracts for the sale of goods or commodities, the term “hundredweight” shall mean one hundred pounds avoirdupois [45.36 kilograms].

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 3000a4; R.C. 1943, § 64-0104.

64-01-05.
Standard weight of bushel.

In contracts for the sale or storage of any of the following articles, the term “bushel” shall mean the number of pounds avoirdupois herein stated:

Alfalfa, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Apples, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Apples, dried, twenty-eight pounds [12.70 kilograms].

Barley, forty-eight pounds [21.77 kilograms].

Beans, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Beans, white runner pole, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Beans, broad windsor, forty-seven pounds [21.32 kilograms].

Beans, lima, fifty-five pounds [20.41 kilograms].

Blue grass seed, fourteen pounds [6.35 kilograms].

Bran, twenty pounds [9.07 kilograms].

Beets, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Buckwheat, forty-two pounds [19.05 kilograms].

Broom corn seed, thirty pounds [13.61 kilograms].

Bromus inermis, fourteen pounds [6.35 kilograms].

Corn, shelled, fifty-six pounds [25.40 kilograms].

Corn, sweet, forty-eight pounds [21.77 kilograms].

Corn, in the ear, seventy pounds [31.75 kilograms].

Clover seed, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Coal, stone, eighty pounds [36.29 kilograms].

Chestnuts, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Cucumbers, forty-eight pounds [21.77 kilograms].

Carrots, forty-five pounds [20.41 kilograms].

Cranberries, thirty-six pounds [16.33 kilograms].

Flaxseed, fifty-six pounds [25.40 kilograms].

Hempseed, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Hickory nuts, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Hungarian grass seed, forty-eight pounds [21.77 kilograms].

Lime, eighty pounds [36.29 kilograms].

Millet, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Oats, thirty-two pounds [14.51 kilograms].

Onions, fifty-two pounds [23.59 kilograms].

Onions, bottom sets, thirty-two pounds [14.51 kilograms].

Onions, top sets, twenty-eight pounds [12.70 kilograms].

Orchard grass seed, fourteen pounds [6.35 kilograms].

Potatoes, sweet, forty-six pounds [20.87 kilograms].

Potatoes, Irish, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Peas, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Peanuts, twenty-two pounds [9.98 kilograms].

Peaches, dried, twenty-eight pounds [12.70 kilograms].

Pears, forty-five pounds [20.41 kilograms].

Parsnips, forty-two pounds [19.05 kilograms].

Plastering hair, unwashed, eight pounds [3.63 kilograms].

Plastering hair, washed, four pounds [1.81 kilograms].

Rye, fifty-six pounds [25.40 kilograms].

Rapeseed, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Rutabagas, fifty-two pounds [23.59 kilograms].

Rhubarb, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Salt, eighty pounds [36.29 kilograms].

Speltz, forty pounds [18.14 kilograms].

Sorghum seed, fifty-seven pounds [25.85 kilograms].

Sunflowers, twenty-five pounds [11.34 kilograms].

Turnips, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Timothy seed, forty-five pounds [20.41 kilograms].

Tomatoes, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Wheat, sixty pounds [27.22 kilograms].

Walnuts, fifty pounds [22.68 kilograms].

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 37, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1722; R.C. 1899, § 1722; S.L. 1901, ch. 213, § 1; 1903, ch. 209, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2188; C.L. 1913, § 3006; S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 3006; R.C. 1943, § 64-0105; S.L. 1981, ch. 624, § 3.

64-01-06.
Ton of hay — Cubic measure.

By weight a ton of hay shall consist of two thousand pounds [907.18 kilograms], and by measurement, of three hundred and forty-three cubic feet [9.71 cubic meters] after the same shall have been stacked thirty days or such other time as may be agreed upon between the parties.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 37, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 1723; R.C. 1899, § 1723; R.C. 1905, § 2189; C.L. 1913, § 3007; R.C. 1943, § 64-0106.

64-01-07.
Standard measurement of wood.

In all contracts for the sale of wood, the term “cord” shall mean one hundred twenty-eight cubic feet [3.62 cubic meters] of wood, in four-foot [1.22-meter] lengths. If the sale is of “sawed wood”, a cord shall mean one hundred ten cubic feet [3.11 cubic meters] when ranked, or one hundred sixty cubic feet [4.53 cubic meters] when thrown irregularly or loosely into a conveyance for delivery to the purchaser. If the sale is of “sawed and split” wood, a cord shall mean one hundred twenty cubic feet [3.39 cubic meters] when ranked and one hundred seventy-five cubic feet [4.96 cubic meters] when thrown irregularly and loosely into a conveyance for delivery.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 3009a1; R.C. 1943, § 64-0107.

Collateral References.

Measure of damages where vendor, after execution of contract of sale but before conveyance of property, removes part of property contracted for, 97 A.L.R.3d 1220.

64-01-08.
Standard weight of coal, charcoal, and ice.

In all contracts for the sale of coal, charcoal, and ice, the term “ton” shall mean two thousand pounds [907.18 kilograms]. A sale of coal, charcoal, or ice in any manner except by weight is prohibited.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 3009a2; R.C. 1943, § 64-0108.

64-01-09.
Standard weight of flour.

In all contracts for the sale of flour, the term “barrel” shall mean one hundred ninety-six net pounds avoirdupois [88.90 kilograms].

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 8; 1925 Supp., § 3009a3; R.C. 1943, § 64-0109.

64-01-10.
Perch of stone.

A perch of mason work or stone shall consist of twenty-five feet, cubic measure [.71 cubic meter].

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 37, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1724; R.C. 1899, § 1724; R.C. 1905, § 2190; C.L. 1913, § 3008; R.C. 1943, § 64-0110.

64-01-11.
Fractional parts of weights and measures.

All contracts for the sale of a fractional part of a bushel, barrel, ton, or cord of any article or commodity on which the legal weight or measurement per bushel, barrel, ton, cord, gallon, or fractional part has been established, shall require and mean a like fractional part of the legal and established weight or measurement per bushel, barrel, ton, or cord.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 239, § 9; 1925 Supp., § 3009a4; R.C. 1943, § 64-0111.